Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-501
Game and fish;
bag and possession limit; violation; penalty.

Except as otherwise
provided by the Game Law, rules and regulations of
the commission, or commission
orders, it shall be unlawful for any person in any one day to
take or have in his or her possession at any time a greater number of game
birds, game animals, or game fish of any one kind than as established pursuant
to section 37-314. Any person violating this section shall be guilty of a
Class III misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be fined at least two hundred
dollars for violations relating to turkeys, small game animals, or game fish.

Laws 1929, c. 112, III, § 4, p. 416;

C.S.1929, § 37-304;

Laws 1933, c. 69, § 1, p. 308;

Laws 1937, c. 89, § 7, p. 294;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 37-304;

R.S.1943, § 37-303;

Laws 1989, LB 34, § 13;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-303;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 221;

Laws 2009, LB105, § 27;

Laws 2013, LB499, § 11.

Illegal possession of game birds is penalized. State v. Allen, 159 Neb. 314, 66 N.W.2d 830 (1954).